sv: Talande trumstämningsmekanism: Spak-/handtagsspänning; Stämskruv/-tapp (mekanisk); Spärrspänning; Repspänning (traditionell); Annat
ro-RO: Mecanismul de acordare al tobei vorbitoare: Tensionare cu manetă/mâner; Acordat cu cheie/tijă (mecanic); Tensionare cu clichet; Tensionare cu sfori (tradițional); Altele
hu: Beszélő dob hangolómechanizmusa: Karos / fogantyús feszítés; Kulcsos / babás (mechanikus); Racsnis feszítéses; Kötélfeszítéses (hagyományos); Egyéb
pt-PT: Mecanismo de afinação do tambor falante: Tensão por alavanca/pega; Afinação por cravelhas (mecânica); Tensão por catraca; Cordas de tensão (tradicional); Outro
el: Μηχανισμός κουρδίσματος τυμπάνων με ομιλία: Τάνυση με μοχλό/λαβή; Κούρδισμα με κλειδιά/ωτίδες (μηχανικό); Τάνυση με καστάνια; Κορδόνια τάνυσης με σκοινί (παραδοσιακό); Άλλο
zh-CN: 说话鼓调音机制: 杠杆/手柄拉紧; 弦轴/音柱调音（机械）; 棘轮拉紧; 绳索拉紧（传统）; 其他
pt-BR: Tambor falante mecanismo de afinação: Tensionamento por alavanca/cabo; Afinado por cravelha/pino (mecânico); Tensionamento por catraca; Cordas de tensão (tradicional); Outro
nl: Talking drum stemmechanisme: Hefboom-/handgreepspanning; Stempennen/-knoppen (mechanisch); Ratelspanning; Touwspankoorden (traditioneel); Overig
fi: Talking drum -rummun kiristys- ja viritysmekanismi: Vipu-/kahvaviritys; Tappi-/ruuviviritteinen (mekaaninen); Räikkäviritys; Nyöriviritys (perinteinen); Muu
cs: Ladicí mechanismus mluvícího bubnu: Napínání pákou/rukojetí; Ladění kolíky/šrouby (mechanické); Napínání ráčnou; Napínání provazy (tradiční); Jiné
ko: 토킹 드럼 조율 방식: 레버/핸들 텐셔닝; 페그/러그 튜닝(기계식); 래칫 텐셔닝; 로프 텐션 코드(전통식); 기타
nb: Stemmingsmekanisme for klemtromme: Spak-/håndtakstramming; Stemt med tapp/stemmeskrue (mekanisk); Skrallestramming; Taustramming (tradisjonell); Annet
vi: Cơ chế điều chỉnh trống nói: Căng bằng đòn bẩy/tay cầm; Chỉnh bằng chốt/tai (cơ học); Căng bằng bánh cóc; Dây căng (truyền thống); Khác
es: Mecanismo de afinación del tambor parlante: Tensión por palanca/mango; Afinado por clavija/bellota (mecánico); Tensión por trinquete; Cuerdas de tensión (tradicional); Otro
pl: Mechanizm strojenia bębna gadającego: Naciąg dźwigniowy / uchwytowy; Strojone kołkami / śrubami (mechanicznie); Naciąg zapadkowy; Sznury naciągowe (tradycyjne); Inny
da: Stemmemekanisme for talking drum: Stramning med greb/håndtag; Stemmeskruer (mekanisk); Stramning med skralde; Rebstramning (traditionel); Andet
tr: Konuşan davul akort mekanizması: Kol/kulp ile gerdirme; Mandal/kulplu akort (mekanik); Cırcırlı gerdirme; İpli gerdirme kordonları (geleneksel); Diğer
ja: トーキングドラムのチューニングメカニズム: レバー/ハンドル式テンション; ペグ/ラグチューニング (機械式); ラチェット式テンション; ロープテンションコード (伝統的); その他
de: Stimmmechanismus der Talking Drum: Hebel-/Griffspannung; Wirbel-/Schraubenstimmung (mechanisch); Ratschenspannung; Seilspannung (traditionell); Sonstige
zh-TW: 說話鼓調音機制: 拉桿/把手張緊; 弦栓/鼓耳調音 (機械式); 棘輪張緊; 繩索張緊 (傳統); 其他
hr-HR: Mehanizam za ugađanje govorećeg bubnja: Zatezanje polugom/ručicom; Ugađanje klinom/zatezačem (mehaničko); Zatezanje zupčanikom; Zatezanje užetom (tradicionalno); Ostalo
bg-BG: Механизъм за настройване на говорещия барабан: Опъване с лост/дръжка; Настройка с ключове/щифтове (механична); Опъване с тресчотка; Въжета за опъване (традиционни); Друго
th: กลไกการปรับแต่งกลองพูดได้: ปรับความตึงด้วยคันโยก/ด้ามจับ; ตั้งเสียงด้วยหมุด/สลัก (กลไก); ปรับความตึงด้วยกลไกเฟืองสับ; เชือกปรับความตึง (แบบดั้งเดิม); อื่นๆ
fr: Mécanisme d’accordage du tambour parlant: Tension par levier/poignée; Accordage par chevilles/tirants (mécanique); Tension par cliquet; Tension par cordes (traditionnelle); Autre
sl-SI: Mehanizem za uglaševanje govorečega bobna: Napenjanje z ročico/ročajem; Uglasitev s klini/zatiči (mehanska); Napenjanje z ragljo; Napenjalne vrvi (tradicionalno); Drugo
it: Meccanismo di accordatura del tamburo parlante: Tensionamento a leva/maniglia; Accordatura a piroli/tiranti (meccanica); Tensionamento a cricchetto; Corde di tensionamento a fune (tradizionale); Altro
en: Talking drum tuning mechanism: Lever/handle tensioning; Peg/lug tuned (mechanical); Ratchet tensioning; Rope tension cords (traditional); Other
lt-LT: Talking drum derinimo mechanizmas: Įtempimas svirtimi / rankena; Derinamas kuoliukais / antgaliais (mechaninis); Terkšlinis įtempimas; Įtempimas virvėmis (tradicinis); Kita
ru: Механизм настройки говорящего барабана: Натяжение рычагом/ручкой; Настройка колками/болтами (механическая); Храповое натяжение; Верёвочное натяжение (традиционное); Другое
sk-SK: Mechanizmus ladenia hovoriaceho bubna: Napínanie pomocou páky/rukoväte; Ladenie pomocou kolíkov/výstupkov (mechanické); Napínanie pomocou račne; Napínacie povrazy (tradičné); Iné